Maryland, session 2026, HB0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 152 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Health – General
13–1002.
(e) (3) (iii) If the Department transfers any money among the components
of the Program as authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Department
shall report the transfer to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate Finance
Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and House Health [and Government
Operations] Committee within 60 days of the transfer.
(g) No later than January 31 of each year, the Department shall report to the
Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, Senate Finance Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and
House Health [and Government Operations] Committee:
(1) The amount of money that was allocated to each component of the
Program during:
(i) The prior fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated at
the end of that year; and
(ii) The current fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated
as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year; and
(2) The amount of money that was distributed to a county as a Local Public
Health Tobacco Grant during:
(i) The prior fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated at
the end of that year; and
(ii) The current fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated
as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year.
13–1102.
(f) (3) (iii) If the Department transfers any money among the components
of the Program as authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Department
shall report the transfer to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate Finance
Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and House Health [and Government
Operations] Committee within 60 days after the transfer.
(h) No later than January 31 of each year, the Department shall report to the
Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, Senate Finance Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and
House Health [and Government Operations] Committee:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 152
(1) The amount of money that was allocated to each component of the
Program during:
(i) The prior fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated at
the end of that year; and
(ii) The current fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated
as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year; and
(2) The amount of money that was distributed to a county as a Local Public
Health Cancer Grant during:
(i) The prior fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated at
the end of that year; and
(ii) The current fiscal year that remained unspent and unobligated
as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year.
15–146.
(b) At least 90 days prior to making any change to medical eligibility for Program
long–term care services, including nursing facility services, home– and community–based
waiver services, and other services that require a nursing facility level of care, the
Department shall provide a report to:
(1) The Senate Finance Committee and the House Health [and
Government Operations] Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article; and
(2) The Medicaid Advisory Committee.
19–1409.
(a) There is an Oversight Committee on Quality of Care in Nursing Homes and
Assisted Living Facilities.
(b) The Oversight Committee shall consist of the following members:
(3) Two members of the House Health [and Government Operations]
Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
19–14C–02.
(a) (1) If a State–owned nursing home that is operated by a contractor receives
a deficiency from or is subject to an enforcement action by a monitoring agency, within 15
– 3 –

Ch. 152 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
days after the final survey finding, the department charged with oversight of the nursing
home shall provide notice of the deficiency or enforcement action to:
(i) The Governor;
(ii) In accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Finance Committee, the House Health [and Government Operations] Committee,
and the members of the General Assembly who represent the district in which the nursing
home is located; and
(iii) The local governing body of the county in which the nursing home
is located.
(2) Within 30 days after the contractor’s final acceptance of a plan of
correction or completion of an informal dispute resolution, the department charged with
oversight of the nursing home shall provide to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Health
[and Government Operations] Committee, and the members of the General Assembly who
represent the district in which the nursing home is located:
(i) A statement of the deficiencies found by the monitoring agency;
(ii) The plan of correction or results of the informal dispute
resolution; and
(iii) All communications from the monitoring agency regarding
survey activities conducted at the nursing home.
20–1701.
(c) The Department shall provide written notice to the Senate Finance
Committee and the House Health [and Government Operations] Committee before
submitting any proposed regulation under subsection (b) of this section to the Maryland
Register for publication.
Article – Insurance
31–106.
(c) (2) Unless waived by the chairs of the committees, at least 30 days before
submitting any proposed regulation to the Maryland Register for publication, the Board
shall submit the proposed regulation to the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Health [and Government Operations] Committee.
31–110.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 152
(g) Before employing an alternative contracting option or active purchasing
strategy, the Exchange:
(1) on or after December 1, but not later than the first day of the next
regular session of the General Assembly, shall submit to the Senate Finance Committee
and the House Health [and Government Operations] Committee, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, a plan for the use of the alternative contracting
option or active purchasing strategy, including an analysis of:
(i) the objectives to be achieved through use of the alternative
contracting option or active purchasing strategy; and
(ii) the impact on the insurance markets inside and outside the
Exchange and on consumers; and
Article – Labor and Employment
5–308.1.
(b) The Commissioner shall submit notice regarding any modifications made to,
or directives issued interpreting, the federal Bloodborne Pathogen Standard after
November 5, 1999 and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, make
recommendations for any legislative changes to the House Health [and Government
Operations] Committee, the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs]
FINANCE Committee, and the General Assembly within 30 days of the issuance of
modifications to the Bloodborne Pathogen Standard.
Article – State Government
2–403.
(a) The Legislative Policy Committee consists of the following 28 members:
(2) from the House:
(i) the Speaker;
(ii) the Speaker Pro Tem;
(iii) the Majority Leader;
(iv) the Chair of the Appropriations Committee;
(v) the Chair of the Health [and Government Operations]
Committee;
– 5 –

Ch. 152 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) the Chair of the Economic Matters Committee;
(vii) the Chair of the Environment and Transportation Committee;
(VIII) THE CHAIR OF THE GOVERNMENT, LABOR, AND ELECTIONS
COMMITTEE;
[(viii)] (IX) the Chair of the Judiciary Committee;
[(ix)] (X) the Chair of the Ways and Means Committee;
[(x)] (XI) the Minority Leader; and
[(xi)] (XII) 1. [4] 3 other Delegates, appointed by the Speaker and
approved by majority vote of the House; or
2. if a Delegate simultaneously serves in 2 of the positions
set forth in items (ii) through [(ix)] (X), inclusive, of this item, [5] 4 other Delegates,
appointed by the Speaker and approved by majority vote of the House.
(b) (2) As far as possible, the Delegates appointed by the Speaker, under
subsection [(a)(2)(xi)] (A)(2)(XII) of this section, shall be representative of the various
sections and interests of the State.
9–1007.
(b) At the request of the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the
Chair of the Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, or the Chair of the House [Health and]
Government [Operations], LABOR, AND ELECTIONS Committee, the State Archivist shall
review, evaluate, and make recommendations to the General Assembly regarding State
designations under Title 7 of the General Provisions Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 6 –